Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 7. INTERGOVERNMENTAL RELATIONS

CHAPTER 742. COORDINATING RELATIONSHIPS BETWEEN LOCAL GOVERNMENTS AND FEDERAL AGENCIES

Sec. 742.001. STATE POLICY. It is the policy of this state to provide technical assistance and to coordinate relationships between local governments and federal agencies regarding federal financial assistance programs.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 742.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Designated state agency" means a state agency either designated or established by state law or designated by the governor to coordinate the actions of a local government participating in a federal financial assistance program.

(2) "Federal financial assistance" means a grant or loan provided by a federal financial assistance program.

(3) "Federal financial assistance program" means a program established by federal law or rule that provides a grant or loan to a local government.

(4) "Local government" means a municipality, county, school district, hospital district, or any other political subdivision of a county or the state.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 742.003. COORDINATING ACTIONS OF LOCAL GOVERNMENTS. (a) The governor or a state agency designated by the governor shall coordinate the actions of a local government participating in a federal financial assistance program unless other state law designates or establishes a particular state agency to perform that duty.

(b) The governor or the designated state agency shall adopt rules to coordinate the actions of local governments participating in federal financial assistance programs.

(c) A rule adopted under this section must be approved by the attorney general and filed with the secretary of state.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 742.004. FEDERAL FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE REQUESTS. (a) The governing body of a local government by order or resolution may request that the governor or the designated state agency act on behalf of the local government in any matter relating to:

(1) a request for federal financial assistance; or

(2) an agreement, assurance of compliance, requirement, or enforcement action relating to the request.

(b) The governing body of a local government by order or resolution may revoke the request and the authority delegated by the request to the governor or designated state agency.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 742.005. APPLICATIONS FOR FEDERAL FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE. (a) A governing body of a local government that has requested that the governor or the designated state agency act on behalf of the local government under Section 742.004(a) shall submit to the governor or the designated state agency each application for federal financial assistance.

(b) The governor or the designated state agency shall approve or disapprove the application.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 742.006. ACTION IF ASSISTANCE WITHHELD OR DEFERRED. The governor or the designated state agency shall take any action that the governor or the agency considers necessary or appropriate to meet the needs of a local government if:

(1) any federal financial assistance is withheld from the local government;

(2) a contract that a local government would otherwise receive under a federal financial assistance program is withheld from the local government; or

(3) a payment is deferred because of an action by a federal government agency relating to the program.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 38, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.